Utah statutes.
31A-8a-207.   Notice of change.

(1)  A health discount program operator shall provide the commissioner notice of:

(a)  any change in the health discount program's organizational name, change of business or mailing address, or change in ownership or principals; and

(b)  any change in the information submitted in accordance with Section 31A-8a-203.

(2) (a)  The notice required by Subsection (1) shall be submitted 30 days prior to any change.

(b) Approval by the commissioner is required for any changes in forms that required approval under Section 31A-8a-203.

(3)  A health insurer or health maintenance organization licensed under this title shall annually file with the Accident and Health Data Survey, a list of all value-added benefits offered at no cost to its enrollees.

